Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1830
False claim; penalty.

Any person who knowingly makes a false claim under the Nebraska Crime Victim's Reparations Act shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor and shall forfeit any benefit received and shall repay the state for any payment of compensation made under the act.

Laws 1978, LB 910, § 30;

Laws 1986, LB 540, § 28.